test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex-der-paccod_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - paččođ: # not checked

    paččođ+V+Inf: paččođ
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Inf: poččuđ
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: poččuum
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: poččuuh
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: paččoo
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: paččojeen
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: poččuuvettee
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: poččuv
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: poččup
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: poččuuvetteđ
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: paččojeh
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: paččojim
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: paččojih
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: poččui
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: poččuim
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: poččuid
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: poččuin
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: poččuim
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: poččuid
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: paččojii
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: poččuuččim
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: poččuuččih
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: poččuuččij
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: poččuuččáim
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: poččuuččáid
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: poččuuččáin
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: poččuuččijm
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: poččuuččijd
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: poččuuččii
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: poččuužeem
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: poččuužeeh
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: poččuš
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: poččuužeen
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: poččušvettee
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: poččuužává
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: poččuužep
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: poččušvetteđ
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: poččuužeh
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: poččuu
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: poččum
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: poččuuččii
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: poččuužii
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: paččojeijee
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrsPrc: paččojijjee
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: poččum
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+PrfPrc: paččom
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Nom: poččum
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ess: poččuumin
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Loc: poččuumist
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+Actio+Ill: poččuumân
    paččođ+V+Der/Pass+V+VAbess: poččuuhánnáá
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačodâm
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: pačodah
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: pačod
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: pačodeen
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: pačodvettee
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: pačodává
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: pačodeh
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pačod
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: pačodim
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: pačodij
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: pačodii
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: pačodiččim
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: pačodičij
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: pačodižžeem
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: pačodiš
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: pačod
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: pačodâm
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: pačodižžii
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+PrfPrc: pačodâm
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+VAbess: pačodhánnáá
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Nom: pačodem
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ill: pačodmân
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Ess: pačodmin
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Loc: pačodmist
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com: pačoddijn
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg1: pačoddijnân
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg2: pačoddijnâd
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Actio+Com+PxSg3: pačoddijnis
    paččođ+V+Der/d+V+Ger: xxxx
    paččođ+V+Der/st+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačostâm
    paččođ+V+Der/tt+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačottâm
    paččođ+V+Der/InchL+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: pačoškuáđám
